District of Columbia statutes.
6-341.01

Transfer to Agency authorized.

In accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, the Mayor of the District of Columbia, consistent with the Council of the District of Columbia’s approval of the urban renewal plan requiring such action, is authorized and directed on behalf of the United States of America to transfer to the Agency all right, title, and interest of the United States in and to the following real properties in the District of Columbia:

(1)

Part of Maryland Avenue Southwest, of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street Southwest, and of 13th Street Southwest, described as follows: beginning for the same at the intersection of the northerly line of Maryland Avenue Southwest, with the east line of Fourteenth Street Southwest, and running thence along the said northerly line of Maryland Avenue in a northeasterly direction 256.25 feet to the west line of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street Southwest; thence along the said line of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street due north 251.67 feet to the south line of D Street Southwest; thence due east 70.0 feet to the east line of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street; thence along the said east line of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street due south 226.50 feet to the northerly line of Maryland Avenue; thence along the said line of Maryland Avenue in a northeasterly direction 256.50 feet to the west line of Thirteenth Street Southwest; thence along the said west line of Thirteenth Street due north 140.92 feet to the south line of D Street; thence due east 110.0 feet to the east line of Thirteenth Street Southwest; thence along the said line of Thirteenth Street due south 101.67 feet to the northerly line of Maryland Avenue; thence along the northerly line of Maryland Avenue in a northeasterly direction 255.85 feet; thence leaving the said line of Maryland Avenue and running along the arc of a circle, the radius of which is 811.27 feet, a central angle of 1 degree 40 minutes 55 seconds, deflecting to the left an arc distance of 23.82 feet; thence south 70 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds west 592.28 feet; thence south 64 degrees 54 minutes 00 seconds west 146.81 feet; thence along the arc of a circle, the radius of which is 60.0 feet, a central angle of 60 degrees 36 minutes 40 seconds, deflecting to the right an arc distance of 63.47 feet to a point of tangent; thence south 60 degrees 36 minutes 40 seconds west 184.47 feet; thence north 51 degrees 37 minutes 00 seconds west 38.0 feet to a point of curve; thence along the arc of a circle, the radius of which is 47.0 feet, a central angle of 51 degrees 37 minutes, deflecting to the right an arc distance of 42.34 feet to a point of tangent; thence due north 30.06 feet to the point of beginning, containing 61,786.20 square feet; all as shown on plat of survey recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 173, page 458.

(2)

Part of 13th Street Southwest, closed, part of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street Southwest, closed, and part of E Street Southwest, closed, as per plat recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Book 140, page 73, described in 1 piece, as follows: beginning for the same at a point in the southerly line of Maryland Avenue Southwest, said point being south 70 degrees 28 minutes 40 seconds west 361.01 feet from the intersection of the west line of Twelfth Street Southwest, with the said southerly line of Maryland Avenue, said point being also the northwesterly corner of original square 299; and running thence along the east line of Thirteenth Street Southwest, closed, due south 409.71 feet; thence due west 95.59 feet; thence north 71 degrees 17 minutes 15 seconds west 15.21 feet to the west line of said Thirteenth Street closed; thence along said line due north 79.47 feet to the south line of E Street Southwest, closed, said point being also the northeast corner of original square 270; thence along the south line of said E Street closed due west 234.62 feet; thence north 71 degrees 17 minutes 15 seconds west 106.13 feet; thence north 51 degrees 37 minutes 00 seconds west 90.15 feet to the north line of said E Street closed; thence along said line due east 94.12 feet to the west line of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street Southwest, closed, said point being also the southeast corner of original square east-of-267; thence along the west line of said Thirteen-and-a-Half Street closed due north 85.83 feet to the said southerly line of Maryland Avenue; thence along said line north 70 degrees 28 minutes 40 seconds east 74.27 feet to the east line of said Thirteen-and-a-Half Street closed, said point being also the northwesterly corner of original square 269; thence along the east line of Thirteen-and-a-Half Street closed due south 110.65 feet to the north line of said E Street closed; thence along said line due east 241.66 feet to the west line of Thirteenth Street closed; thence along said line due north 196.33 feet to the southerly line of said Maryland Avenue; thence along said line north 70 degrees 28 minutes 40 seconds east 116.71 feet to the point of beginning, containing 80,206.53 square feet; all as shown on plat of computation recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 183, page 81.

(3)

Part of Maryland Avenue Southwest, described as follows: beginning for the same at the intersection of the west line of Twelfth Street Southwest, with the southerly line of Maryland Avenue Southwest, said point being also the northeasterly corner of original square 299; and running thence along the said southerly line of Maryland Avenue south 70 degrees 28 minutes 40 seconds west 889.79 feet; thence north 53 degrees 21 minutes 10 seconds east 104.83 feet; thence north 72 degrees 43 minutes 00 seconds east 790.21 feet to the point of beginning, containing 13,733.95 square feet; all as shown on plat of computation recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 183, page 81.

(4)

Parts of 3rd Street Southwest, 4th Street Southwest, and Virginia Avenue Southwest, abutting square 537, described in 1 piece as follows: beginning for the same at the intersection of the north line of E Street Southwest, with the west line of Third Street Southwest, said point also being the southeast corner of said square 537, and running thence along the said line of Third Street, due north 122.08 feet to the southerly line of Virginia Avenue Southwest; thence along said line of Virginia Avenue in a northwesterly direction 598.0 feet to the east line of Fourth Street Southwest; thence along said line of Fourth Street due south 323.33 feet to the southwest corner of said square 537; thence due west 13.0 feet; thence due north 373.68 feet; thence in a southeasterly direction, parallel with and 16.0 feet southwestwardly at right angles from the centerline of track numbered 1 of railroad of the Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Washington Railroad Company, 633.12 feet; thence due south 160.60 feet; thence due west 19.36 feet to the point of beginning, containing 33,698.44 square feet; all as shown on plat of survey recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 174, page 413.

(5)

Parts of 3rd Street Southwest, Virginia Avenue Southwest, and public space abutting square N-583, described in 1 piece, as follows: beginning for the same at the intersection of the north line of E Street Southwest, with the east line of Third Street Southwest, said point also being the southwest corner of square N-583, and running thence due west 20.42 feet; thence due north 135.50 feet; thence in a southeasterly direction, parallel with and 16.0 feet southwestwardly at right angles from the centerline of track numbered 1 of railroad of the Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Washington Railroad Company, 390.04 feet; thence due south 4.23 feet; thence due west 225.71 feet to the southeast corner of said square N-583; thence along said square due north 40.0 feet to the southwesterly line of Virginia Avenue Southwest; thence along said line in a northwesterly direction 128.33 feet to the said east line of Third Street; thence along said line due south 82.67 feet to the point of beginning, containing 18,229.36 square feet; all as shown on plat of survey recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 174, page 413.

(6)

Part of Virginia Avenue, 6th Street, and public space abutting square S-463, described as follows: beginning for the same at the intersection of the west line of Sixth Street, southwest, with the northerly line of Virginia Avenue, said point of beginning being also the most southerly corner of square S-463; and running thence along the said west line of Sixth Street due north 75.33 feet; thence due east 9.25 feet; thence due south 106.15 feet; thence in a northwesterly direction along the line 25.90 feet from and parallel to the said northerly line of Virginia Avenue north 70 degrees 17 minutes 40 seconds west 522.42 feet; thence due north 20.0 feet; thence due east 134.24 feet to the northwest corner of said square S-463; thence along the west line of said square due south 40.58 feet to the said northerly line of Virginia Avenue; thence in a southeasterly direction along the said northerly line of Virginia Avenue south 70 degrees 17 minutes 40 seconds east 370.0 feet to the point of beginning, containing 16,461.50 square feet; all as shown on plat of survey recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 176, page 372.

(7)

Part of D Street and Maryland Avenue, Southwest, described as follows: beginning for the same at the southeast corner of square 386, and running thence due south 14.26 feet; thence due west 605.71 feet to a point of curve; thence along the arc of a circle, the radius of which is 600.0 feet, deflecting to the left an arc distance of 125.58 feet; thence north 70 degrees 28 minutes 00 seconds east 774.97 feet; thence due south 47.51 feet to the northeast corner of said square 386; thence along the northwesterly boundary of said square in a southwesterly direction 432.25 feet to the northwest corner of said square; thence due south 40.0 feet to the southwest corner of said square; thence along the southerly boundary of said square due east 407.42 feet to the point of beginning, containing 39,922.0 square feet; all as shown on plat of survey recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia in Survey Book 173, page 396.

Nov. 2, 1965, 79 Stat. 1180, Pub. L. 89-317, § 1
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 5-733.
1981 Ed., § 5-836.